Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-957
Special election by mail; verification of signatures; identification requirements.

(1) An official ballot under section 32-953 shall be counted only if it is returned in the identification envelope, the envelope is signed by the voter to whom it was issued, the signature is verified by the election commissioner or county clerk, and the voter provided the voter's driver's license number or state identification card number on the envelope or provided a photocopy of valid photographic identification or a reasonable impediment certification inside the envelope.

(2) The election commissioner or county clerk shall verify the signature on each identification envelope received in his or her office with the signature appearing on the voter registration records. If the election commissioner or county clerk is unable to verify a signature, the election commissioner or county clerk shall contact the voter within two days after determining that he or she is unable to verify the signature to ascertain whether the voter cast a ballot. The election commissioner or county clerk may request that the registered voter sign and submit a current signature card pursuant to section 32-318. The election commissioner or county clerk may begin verifying the signatures as the envelopes are received in his or her office.

(3) If a voter fails to provide the voter's driver's license number or state identification card number, valid photographic identification, or a reasonable impediment certification as required under subsection (1) of this section, the election commissioner or county clerk shall contact the voter no later than the day after the election and the voter shall present valid photographic identification or a reasonable impediment certification to the election commissioner or county clerk on or before the Friday after the election or the ballot shall not be counted.

(4) If the election commissioner or county clerk determines that a voter has voted more than once, no ballot cast by that voter in that election shall be counted. The election commissioner or county clerk shall make public any record or list of registered voters who have returned their ballots.

(5) Subsections (1) and (3) of this section do not apply to any voter who casts a ballot pursuant to section 32-939.02 or 32-939.03.

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB838, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 28.
January 1, 2027